apertium-ga-gd/apertium-ga-gd.ga-full.dix
    <pardef n="clo/ch__n">
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>cha</l>
          <r>ch<s n="n"/><s n="f"/><s n="pl"/><s n="nom"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>chadh</l>
          <r>ch<s n="vblex"/><s n="ger"/><s n="sg"/><s n="nom"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>chadh</l>
          <r>ch<s n="vblex"/><s n="imp"/><s n="p3"/><s n="sg"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>chadh</l>
          <r>ch<s n="vblex"/><s n="past"/><s n="aut"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>chaidís</l>
          <r>ch<s n="vblex"/><s n="imp"/><s n="p3"/><s n="pl"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>chaigí</l>
          <r>ch<s n="vblex"/><s n="imp"/><s n="p2"/><s n="pl"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>chaimid</l>
          <r>ch<s n="vblex"/><s n="pres"/><s n="p1"/><s n="pl"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>chaim</l>
          <r>ch<s n="vblex"/><s n="imp"/><s n="p1"/><s n="sg"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>chaimis</l>
          <r>ch<s n="vblex"/><s n="imp"/><s n="p1"/><s n="pl"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>chaim</l>
          <r>ch<s n="vblex"/><s n="pres"/><s n="p1"/><s n="sg"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>chann</l>
          <r>ch<s n="vblex"/><s n="pres"/><s n="p2"/><s n="pl"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>chann</l>
          <r>ch<s n="vblex"/><s n="pres"/><s n="p2"/><s n="sg"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>chann</l>
          <r>ch<s n="vblex"/><s n="pres"/><s n="p3"/><s n="pl"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>chann</l>
          <r>ch<s n="vblex"/><s n="pres"/><s n="p3"/><s n="sg"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>ch</l>
          <r>ch<s n="n"/><s n="f"/><s n="sg"/><s n="nom"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>chfaidh</l>
          <r>ch<s n="vblex"/><s n="fti"/><s n="p1"/><s n="sg"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>chfaidh</l>
          <r>ch<s n="vblex"/><s n="fti"/><s n="p2"/><s n="pl"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>chfaidh</l>
          <r>ch<s n="vblex"/><s n="fti"/><s n="p2"/><s n="sg"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>chfaidh</l>
          <r>ch<s n="vblex"/><s n="fti"/><s n="p3"/><s n="pl"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>chfaidh</l>
          <r>ch<s n="vblex"/><s n="fti"/><s n="p3"/><s n="sg"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>chfaimid</l>
          <r>ch<s n="vblex"/><s n="fti"/><s n="p1"/><s n="pl"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>chfar</l>
          <r>ch<s n="vblex"/><s n="fti"/><s n="aut"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>ch</l>
          <r>ch<s n="n"/><s n="f"/><s n="pl"/><s n="gen"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>ch</l>
          <r>ch<s n="vblex"/><s n="imp"/><s n="p2"/><s n="sg"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>chta</l>
          <r>ch<s n="vblex"/><s n="ger"/><s n="sg"/><s n="gen"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>chta</l>
          <r>ch<s n="vblex"/><s n="pp"/><s n="f"/><s n="sg"/><s n="gen"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>chta</l>
          <r>ch<s n="vblex"/><s n="pp"/><s n="m"/><s n="sg"/><s n="gen"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>chta</l>
          <r>ch<s n="vblex"/><s n="pp"/><s n="pl"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>chta</l>
          <r>ch<s n="vblex"/><s n="pp"/><s n="sg"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>chtar</l>
          <r>ch<s n="vblex"/><s n="pres"/><s n="aut"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>iche</l>
          <r>ch<s n="n"/><s n="f"/><s n="sg"/><s n="gen"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
    </pardef>
    <pardef n="ó/r__n">
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>ir</l>
          <r>r<s n="n"/><s n="m"/><s n="pl"/><s n="nom"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>ir</l>
          <r>r<s n="n"/><s n="m"/><s n="sg"/><s n="gen"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>r</l>
          <r>r<s n="n"/><s n="m"/><s n="sg"/><s n="nom"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>r</l>
          <r>r<s n="n"/><s n="m"/><s n="pl"/><s n="gen"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
    </pardef>
    <pardef n="de/alg__n">
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>alga</l>
          <r>alg<s n="n"/><s n="f"/><s n="pl"/><s n="nom"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>alg</l>
          <r>alg<s n="n"/><s n="f"/><s n="sg"/><s n="nom"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>alg</l>
          <r>alg<s n="n"/><s n="f"/><s n="pl"/><s n="gen"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>ilge</l>
          <r>alg<s n="n"/><s n="f"/><s n="sg"/><s n="gen"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
    </pardef>
    <pardef n="rómha/ll__adj">
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>ille</l>
          <r>ll<s n="adj"/><s n="f"/><s n="sg"/><s n="gen"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>lla</l>
          <r>ll<s n="adj"/><s n="pl"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>ll</l>
          <r>ll<s n="adj"/><s n="m"/><s n="sg"/><s n="gen"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>ll</l>
          <r>ll<s n="adj"/><s n="sg"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
    </pardef>
    <pardef n="feo/il__n">
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>il</l>
          <r>il<s n="n"/><s n="f"/><s n="sg"/><s n="nom"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>la</l>
          <r>il<s n="n"/><s n="f"/><s n="sg"/><s n="gen"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>lta</l>
          <r>il<s n="n"/><s n="f"/><s n="pl"/><s n="nom"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>lta</l>
          <r>il<s n="n"/><s n="f"/><s n="pl"/><s n="gen"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
    </pardef>
    <pardef n="banfhái/dh__n">
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>dh</l>
          <r>dh<s n="n"/><s n="m"/><s n="sg"/><s n="nom"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>dh</l>
          <r>dh<s n="n"/><s n="m"/><s n="sg"/><s n="gen"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>the</l>
          <r>dh<s n="n"/><s n="m"/><s n="pl"/><s n="nom"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
    </pardef>
    <pardef n="treas__adj">
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>a</l>
          <r><s n="n"/><s n="m"/><s n="pl"/><s n="nom"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>a</l>
          <r><s n="n"/><s n="m"/><s n="sg"/><s n="gen"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l></l>
          <r><s n="n"/><s n="m"/><s n="sg"/><s n="nom"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l></l>
          <r><s n="n"/><s n="m"/><s n="pl"/><s n="gen"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l></l>
          <r><s n="adj"/><s n="sg"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
    </pardef>

    <e lm="rómhall"><i>rómha</i><par n="rómha/ll__adj"/></e>
    <e lm="treas"><i>treas</i><par n="treas__adj"/></e>
    <e lm="airdemhéadar"><par n="initial-a"/><i>irdemhéada</i><par n="ó/r__n"/></e>
    <e lm="cuasár"><par n="initial-c"/><i>uasá</i><par n="ó/r__n"/></e>
    <e lm="drochthionchar"><par n="initial-d"/><i>rochthioncha</i><par n="ó/r__n"/></e>
    <e lm="cloch"><par n="initial-c"/><i>lo</i><par n="clo/ch__n"/></e>
    <e lm="cór"><par n="initial-c"/><i>ó</i><par n="ó/r__n"/></e>
    <e lm="caecar"><par n="initial-c"/><i>aeca</i><par n="ó/r__n"/></e>
    <e lm="cogar"><par n="initial-c"/><i>oga</i><par n="ó/r__n"/></e>
    <e lm="arócar"><par n="initial-a"/><i>róca</i><par n="ó/r__n"/></e>
    <e lm="croch"><par n="initial-c"/><i>ro</i><par n="clo/ch__n"/></e>
    <e lm="dintiúr"><par n="initial-d"/><i>intiú</i><par n="ó/r__n"/></e>
    <e lm="carachtar"><par n="initial-c"/><i>arachta</i><par n="ó/r__n"/></e>
    <e lm="aer"><par n="initial-a"/><i>e</i><par n="ó/r__n"/></e>
    <e lm="dobharcheantar"><par n="initial-d"/><i>obharcheanta</i><par n="ó/r__n"/></e>
    <e lm="bunúdar"><par n="initial-b"/><i>unúda</i><par n="ó/r__n"/></e>
    <e lm="aimpmhéadar"><par n="initial-a"/><i>impmhéada</i><par n="ó/r__n"/></e>
    <e lm="feidhmchlár"><par n="initial-f"/><i>eidhmchlá</i><par n="ó/r__n"/></e>
    <e lm="bleadar"><par n="initial-b"/><i>leada</i><par n="ó/r__n"/></e>
    <e lm="coineascar"><par n="initial-c"/><i>oineasca</i><par n="ó/r__n"/></e>
    <e lm="faobhar"><par n="initial-f"/><i>aobha</i><par n="ó/r__n"/></e>
    <e lm="banfháidh"><par n="initial-b"/><i>anfhái</i><par n="banfhái/dh__n"/></e>
    <e lm="foghar"><par n="initial-f"/><i>ogha</i><par n="ó/r__n"/></e>
    <e lm="compútar"><par n="initial-c"/><i>ompúta</i><par n="ó/r__n"/></e>
    <e lm="dineasár"><par n="initial-d"/><i>ineasá</i><par n="ó/r__n"/></e>
    <e lm="dollar"><par n="initial-d"/><i>olla</i><par n="ó/r__n"/></e>
    <e lm="dealg"><par n="initial-d"/><i>e</i><par n="de/alg__n"/></e>
    <e lm="bultúr"><par n="initial-b"/><i>ultú</i><par n="ó/r__n"/></e>
    <e lm="amhantar"><par n="initial-a"/><i>mhanta</i><par n="ó/r__n"/></e>
    <e lm="clabhar"><par n="initial-c"/><i>labha</i><par n="ó/r__n"/></e>
    <e lm="calraiméadar"><par n="initial-c"/><i>alraiméada</i><par n="ó/r__n"/></e>
    <e lm="ceathrar"><par n="initial-c"/><i>eathra</i><par n="ó/r__n"/></e>
    <e lm="cúcamar"><par n="initial-c"/><i>úcama</i><par n="ó/r__n"/></e>
    <e lm="feoil"><par n="initial-f"/><i>eo</i><par n="feo/il__n"/></e>
    <e lm="cealg"><par n="initial-c"/><i>e</i><par n="de/alg__n"/></e>
    <e lm="baraiméadar"><par n="initial-b"/><i>araiméada</i><par n="ó/r__n"/></e>
    <e lm="ceintiméadar"><par n="initial-c"/><i>eintiméada</i><par n="ó/r__n"/></e>
    <e lm="quizchlár"><i>quizchlá</i><par n="ó/r__n"/></e>
    <e lm="rapar"><i>rapa</i><par n="ó/r__n"/></e>
    <e lm="ríomhchlár"><i>ríomhchlá</i><par n="ó/r__n"/></e>
    <e lm="muirphictiúr"><par n="initial-m"/><i>uirphictiú</i><par n="ó/r__n"/></e>
    <e lm="leathar"><i>leatha</i><par n="ó/r__n"/></e>
    <e lm="plódcheantar"><par n="initial-p"/><i>lódcheanta</i><par n="ó/r__n"/></e>
    <e lm="scigphictiúr"><par n="initial-s"/><i>cigphictiú</i><par n="ó/r__n"/></e>
    <e lm="lámhleabhar"><i>lámhleabha</i><par n="ó/r__n"/></e>
    <e lm="gaobhar"><par n="initial-g"/><i>aobha</i><par n="ó/r__n"/></e>
    <e lm="nádúr"><i>nádú</i><par n="ó/r__n"/></e>
    <e lm="scótar"><par n="initial-s"/><i>cóta</i><par n="ó/r__n"/></e>
    <e lm="gadhar"><par n="initial-g"/><i>adha</i><par n="ó/r__n"/></e>
    <e lm="scórchlár"><par n="initial-s"/><i>córchlá</i><par n="ó/r__n"/></e>
    <e lm="miosúr"><par n="initial-m"/><i>iosú</i><par n="ó/r__n"/></e>
    <e lm="imleabhar"><par n="initial-i"/><i>mleabha</i><par n="ó/r__n"/></e>
    <e lm="saothar"><par n="initial-s"/><i>aotha</i><par n="ó/r__n"/></e>
    <e lm="lágar"><i>lága</i><par n="ó/r__n"/></e>
    <e lm="struchtúr"><par n="initial-s"/><i>truchtú</i><par n="ó/r__n"/></e>
    <e lm="tarathar"><par n="initial-t"/><i>aratha</i><par n="ó/r__n"/></e>
    <e lm="tionchar"><par n="initial-t"/><i>ioncha</i><par n="ó/r__n"/></e>
    <e lm="treabhsar"><par n="initial-t"/><i>reabhsa</i><par n="ó/r__n"/></e>
    <e lm="trálaer"><par n="initial-t"/><i>rálae</i><par n="ó/r__n"/></e>
    <e lm="tionúr"><par n="initial-t"/><i>ionú</i><par n="ó/r__n"/></e>
    <e lm="slapar"><par n="initial-s"/><i>lapa</i><par n="ó/r__n"/></e>
